Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.154

Solid waste—Compliance with chapter 70A.205 RCW required.

Nothing in RCW 35.21.152 will relieve a city or town of its obligations to comply with the requirements of chapter 70A.205 RCW.

[ 2020 c 20 s 1007; 1989 c 399 s 3; 1975 1st ex.s. c 208 s 3.]